Hawaii statutes.
[§195-10] Alienation of natural area
reserves. Natural area reserves shall be held in trust and shall not be
alienated except to another public use upon a finding by the department of an
imperative and unavoidable public necessity. [L 1987, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next